Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB287.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The sum of $75,802,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Workmen's Compensation Administration Fund to the Department of Labor and Industry for the payment of all salaries, wages and other compensation and travel expenses, for contractual services and other expenses necessary for the administration of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, and the act of June 21, 1939 (P.L.566, No.284), known as The Pennsylvania Occupational Disease Act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year ending June 12345678910111213141516171819202122 30, 2025.Section 2. The sum of $550,000 is appropriated from the restricted revenue account within the Workmen's Compensation Administration Fund to the Office of Small Business Advocate in the Department of Community and Economic Development as provided in the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, for the operation of that office for the fiscal year July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026.Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0287PN0264 - 2 - 12345678910